src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_A_mashkimod_gt-norm.yaml
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: nimashkimodaamishinaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: gimashkimodaamishinaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: gimashkimodaamishiwaa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4: omashkimodaamishini
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: omashkimodaamishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt: nimashkimodaamishiban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodaamishidin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt: gimashkimodaamishiban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodaamishidin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt: omashkimodaamishiban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: omashkimodaamishidin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt: imashkimodaamishiban
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: imashkimodaamishidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+4: nimashkimodaamishan
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: nimashkimodaamishing
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: nimashkimodaamishan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+4: gimashkimodaamishan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: gimashkimodaamishing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: gimashkimodaamishan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+4: omashkimodaamishan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: omashkimodaamishing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: omashkimodaamishan
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+4: imashkimodaamishan
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: imashkimodaamishing
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: imashkimodaamishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: nimashkimodaaminaaniban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodaaminaanidig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodaaminaaniban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodaaminaanidig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodaamiwaaban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodaamiwaadig
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+4+Prt: omashkimodaaminiiban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl: omashkimodaaminiidin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: omashkimodaamiwaaban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: omashkimodaamiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+4: nimashkimodaaminaanin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: nimashkimodaaminaaning
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: nimashkimodaaminaanig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+4: gimashkimodaaminaanin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaaminaaning
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaaminaanig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+4: gimashkimodaamiwaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaamiwaang
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaamiwaag
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+4+4: omashkimodaaminiwa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+4+Loc: omashkimodaaminiing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+4+Pl: omashkimodaaminiwa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+4: omashkimodaamiwaan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: omashkimodaamiwaang
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: omashkimodaamiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt+4: nimashkimodaamibaniin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt+Loc: nimashkimodaamibaniing
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt+Pl: nimashkimodaamibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt+4: gimashkimodaamibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodaamibaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodaamibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt+4: omashkimodaamibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt+Loc: omashkimodaamibaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt+Pl: omashkimodaamibaniin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt+4: imashkimodaamibaniin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt+Loc: imashkimodaamibaniing
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt+Pl: imashkimodaamibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nimashkimodaashinaaniban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodaashinaanidig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodaashinaaniban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodaashinaanidig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodaashiwaaban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodaashiwaadig
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt: omashkimodaashiniiban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: omashkimodaashiniidin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: omashkimodaashiwaaban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: omashkimodaashiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+4: nimashkimodaashinaanin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nimashkimodaashinaaning
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nimashkimodaashinaanig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+4: gimashkimodaashinaanin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaashinaaning
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaashinaanig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+4: gimashkimodaashiwaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaashiwaang
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaashiwaag
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+4+4: omashkimodaashiniwa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+4+Loc: omashkimodaashiniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+4+Pl: omashkimodaashiniwa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+4: omashkimodaashiwaan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: omashkimodaashiwaang
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: omashkimodaashiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt+4: nimashkimodaashibaniin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: nimashkimodaashibaniing
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: nimashkimodaashibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt+4: gimashkimodaashibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodaashibaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodaashibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt+4: omashkimodaashibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: omashkimodaashibaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: omashkimodaashibaniin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt+4: imashkimodaashibaniin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: imashkimodaashibaniing
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: imashkimodaashibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Prt+4: nimashkimodaanaanibaniin
     1+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nimashkimodaanaanibaniing
     1+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nimashkimodaanaanibaniig
     1+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nimashkimodaanaanidigan
     1+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nimashkimodaanaanidiging
     1+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nimashkimodaanaanidigag
     2+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Prt+4: gimashkimodaanaanibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodaanaanibaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodaanaanibaniig
     2+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimashkimodaanaanidigan
     2+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaanaanidiging
     2+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaanaanidigag
     2+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Prt+4: gimashkimodaawaabaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodaawaabaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodaawaabaniig
     2+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimashkimodaawaadigan
     2+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaawaadiging
     2+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaawaadigag
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+4+Prt+4: omashkimodaaniibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+4+Prt+Loc: omashkimodaaniibaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+4+Prt+Pl: omashkimodaaniibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omashkimodaaniidigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omashkimodaaniidiging
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omashkimodaaniidigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Prt+4: omashkimodaawaabaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omashkimodaawaabaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omashkimodaawaabaniig
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omashkimodaawaadigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omashkimodaawaadiging
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omashkimodaawaadigag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     mashkimod+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: mashkimodenyishibaniin
     mashkimod+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: mashkimodenyishibaniing
     mashkimod+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: mashkimodenyishibaniin
     mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: mashkimodensishibaniin
     mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: mashkimodensishibaniing
     mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: mashkimodensishibaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: nimashkimodenyimishinaan
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: nimashkimodensimishinaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: gimashkimodenyimishinaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: gimashkimodenyimishiwaa
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: gimashkimodensimishinaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: gimashkimodensimishiwaa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4: omashkimodenyimishini
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: omashkimodenyimishiwaa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4: omashkimodensimishini
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: omashkimodensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: nimashkimodenyimishiban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodenyimishidin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: nimashkimodensimishiban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodensimishidin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: gimashkimodenyimishiban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodenyimishidin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: gimashkimodensimishiban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodensimishidin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: omashkimodenyimishiban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: omashkimodenyimishidin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: omashkimodensimishiban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: omashkimodensimishidin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: imashkimodenyimishiban
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: imashkimodenyimishidin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: imashkimodensimishiban
     X+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: imashkimodensimishidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+4: nimashkimodenyimishan
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: nimashkimodenyimishing
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: nimashkimodenyimishan
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: nimashkimodensimishan
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: nimashkimodensimishing
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: nimashkimodensimishan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+4: gimashkimodenyimishan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: gimashkimodenyimishing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: gimashkimodenyimishan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: gimashkimodensimishan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: gimashkimodensimishing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: gimashkimodensimishan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+4: omashkimodenyimishan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: omashkimodenyimishing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: omashkimodenyimishan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: omashkimodensimishan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: omashkimodensimishing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: omashkimodensimishan
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+4: imashkimodenyimishan
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: imashkimodenyimishing
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: imashkimodenyimishan
     X+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: imashkimodensimishan
     X+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: imashkimodensimishing
     X+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: imashkimodensimishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: nimashkimodenyiminaaniban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodenyiminaanidig
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: nimashkimodensiminaaniban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodensiminaanidig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodenyiminaaniban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodenyiminaanidig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodenyimiwaaban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodenyimiwaadig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodensiminaaniban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodensiminaanidig
